Washington statutes.
RCW 19.194.040

Application.

RCW 19.194.010 through 19.194.030 do not apply to trade-in or exchange of computers, or computer hardware, between consumers and retailers, or their branch facilities, when the computer or computer hardware was originally purchased from that same retailer.

[ 1998 c 134 s 4.]